Illinois, session 104th, SB3713.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 5Section 11a-17 as follows: 6    (755 ILCS 5/11a-17)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-17)7    Sec. 11a-17. Duties of personal guardian. 8    (a) To the extent ordered by the court and under the 9direction of the court, the guardian of the person shall have 10custody of the ward and the ward's minor and adult dependent 11children and shall procure for them and shall make provision 12for their support, care, comfort, health, education and 13maintenance, and professional services as are appropriate, but 14the ward's spouse may not be deprived of the custody and 15education of the ward's minor and adult dependent children, 16without the consent of the spouse, unless the court finds that 17the spouse is not a fit and competent person to have that 18custody and education. The guardian shall assist the ward in 19the development of maximum self-reliance and independence. The 20guardian of the person may petition the court for an order 21directing the guardian of the estate to pay an amount 22periodically for the provision of the services specified by 23the court order. If the ward's estate is insufficient to   SB3713- 2 -LRB104 18238 JRC 31677 b1provide for education and the guardian of the ward's person 2fails to provide education, the court may award the custody of 3the ward to some other person for the purpose of providing 4education. If a person makes a settlement upon or provision 5for the support or education of a ward, the court may make an 6order for the visitation of the ward by the person making the 7settlement or provision as the court deems proper. A guardian 8of the person may not admit a ward to a mental health facility 9except at the ward's request as provided in Article IV of the 10Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code and unless 11the ward has the capacity to consent to such admission as 12provided in Article IV of the Mental Health and Developmental 13Disabilities Code. 14    (a-3) If a guardian of an estate has not been appointed, 15the guardian of the person may, without an order of court, 16open, maintain, and transfer funds to an ABLE account on 17behalf of the ward and the ward's minor and adult dependent 18children as specified under Section 16.6 of the State 19Treasurer Act. 20    (a-5) If the ward filed a petition for dissolution of 21marriage under the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 22Marriage Act before the ward was adjudicated a person with a 23disability under this Article, the guardian of the ward's 24person and estate may maintain that action for dissolution of 25marriage on behalf of the ward. Upon petition by the guardian 26of the ward's person or estate, the court may authorize and   SB3713- 3 -LRB104 18238 JRC 31677 b1direct a guardian of the ward's person or estate to file a 2petition for dissolution of marriage or to file a petition for 3legal separation or declaration of invalidity of marriage 4under the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act on 5behalf of the ward if the court finds by clear and convincing 6evidence that the relief sought is in the ward's best 7interests. In making its determination, the court shall 8consider the standards set forth in subsection (e) of this 9Section.10    (a-10) Except as provided in this subsection, an 11individual under guardianship who understands the nature, 12effect, duties, and obligations of marriage does not lose the 13right to marry and may marry without the prior consent of the 14individual's guardian or authorization of the court. 15    (a-15) A court may remove the right to marry if:16        (1) removal of the individual's right to marry is 17    included as requested relief in a petition for a limited 18    or plenary guardian or upon application of the guardian; 19    and20        (2) the court finds by clear and convincing evidence 21    after an evidentiary hearing that the individual lacks the 22    capacity to understand the nature, effect, duties, and 23    obligations of a decision to marry.24    (a-20) An individual from whom the right to marry has been 25removed may nonetheless marry: 26        (1) with the consent of the guardian, without the   SB3713- 4 -LRB104 18238 JRC 31677 b1    necessity of court authorization; or2        (2) upon petition by the individual or the 3    individual's guardian of the person or estate, the court 4    may direct a guardian of the person or estate to consent, 5    on behalf of the individual, to the individual's marriage. 6    The court shall direct the guardian to consent to the 7    marriage unless, considering the expressed preferences of 8    the individual, the court finds by clear and convincing 9    evidence that the individual: 10            (A) currently lacks the capacity to understand the 11        nature, effect, duties, and obligations of marriage; 12        and13            (B) entering into marriage is contrary to the 14        individual's best interests. 15    (a-25) Any marriage entered into by one or more 16individuals from whom the right to marriage had been removed 17at the time of the marriage is void unless: 18        (1) the guardian files a notice with the court 19    indicating that the guardian consents to the marriage;20        (2) the right to marriage is restored to an individual 21    from whom it had been removed and the individual files a 22    notice with the court ratifying the decision to marry; or23        (3) upon petition by the individual, the individual's 24    guardian of the person or estate, or the putative spouse, 25    the court enters an order ratifying the decision to marry. 26    The court shall ratify the decision to marry unless,   SB3713- 5 -LRB104 18238 JRC 31677 b1    considering the expressed preferences of the individual, 2    the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 3    individual: 4            (A) currently lacks the capacity to understand the 5        nature, effect, duties, and obligations of marriage; 6        and7            (B) entering into marriage is contrary to the 8        individual's best interests. 9    (a-30) A guardian may contest the validity of a marriage 10under Sections 301 and 302 of the Illinois Marriage and 11Dissolution of Marriage Act. 12    (a-35) The county clerk shall issue a license to marry 13under subsection (a-25) by accepting the guardian's 14application, appearance, and signature on behalf of the 15individual under guardianship or upon presentation of a court 16order authorizing and directing the guardian to consent to a 17marriage. 18    Upon petition by the guardian of the ward's person or 19estate, the court may authorize and direct a guardian of the 20ward's person or estate to consent, on behalf of the ward, to 21the ward's marriage pursuant to Part II of the Illinois 22Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act if the court finds by 23clear and convincing evidence that the marriage is in the 24ward's best interests. In making its determination, the court 25shall consider the standards set forth in subsection (e) of 26this Section. Upon presentation of a court order authorizing   SB3713- 6 -LRB104 18238 JRC 31677 b1and directing a guardian of the ward's person and estate to 2consent to the ward's marriage, the county clerk shall accept 3the guardian's application, appearance, and signature on 4behalf of the ward for purposes of issuing a license to marry 5under Section 203 of the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 6Marriage Act.7    (b) If the court directs, the guardian of the person shall 8file with the court at intervals indicated by the court, a 9report that shall state briefly: (1) the current mental, 10physical, and social condition of the ward and the ward's 11minor and adult dependent children; (2) their present living 12arrangement, and a description and the address of every 13residence where they lived during the reporting period and the 14length of stay at each place; (3) a summary of the medical, 15educational, vocational, and other professional services given 16to them; (4) a resume of the guardian's visits with and 17activities on behalf of the ward and the ward's minor and adult 18dependent children; (5) a recommendation as to the need for 19continued guardianship; (6) any other information requested by 20the court or useful in the opinion of the guardian. The Office 21of the State Guardian shall assist the guardian in filing the 22report when requested by the guardian. The court may take such 23action as it deems appropriate pursuant to the report.24    (c) Absent court order pursuant to the Illinois Power of 25Attorney Act directing a guardian to exercise powers of the 26principal under an agency that survives disability, the   SB3713- 7 -LRB104 18238 JRC 31677 b1guardian has no power, duty, or liability with respect to any 2personal or health care matters covered by the agency. This 3subsection (c) applies to all agencies, whenever and wherever 4executed.5    (d) A guardian acting as a surrogate decision maker under 6the Health Care Surrogate Act shall have all the rights of a 7surrogate under that Act without court order including the 8right to make medical treatment decisions such as decisions to 9forgo or withdraw life-sustaining treatment. Any decisions by 10the guardian to forgo or withdraw life-sustaining treatment 11that are not authorized under the Health Care Surrogate Act 12shall require a court order. Nothing in this Section shall 13prevent an agent acting under a power of attorney for health 14care from exercising his or her authority under the Illinois 15Power of Attorney Act without further court order, unless a 16court has acted under Section 2-10 of the Illinois Power of 17Attorney Act. If a guardian is also a health care agent for the 18ward under a valid power of attorney for health care, the 19guardian acting as agent may execute his or her authority 20under that act without further court order.21    (e) Decisions made by a guardian on behalf of a ward shall 22be made in accordance with the following standards for 23decision making. The guardian shall consider the ward's 24current preferences to the extent the ward has the ability to 25participate in decision making when those preferences are 26known or reasonably ascertainable by the guardian. Decisions   SB3713- 8 -LRB104 18238 JRC 31677 b1by the guardian shall conform to the ward's current 2preferences: (1) unless the guardian reasonably believes that 3doing so would result in substantial harm to the ward's 4welfare or personal or financial interests; and (2) so long as 5such decisions give substantial weight to what the ward, if 6competent, would have done or intended under the 7circumstances, taking into account evidence that includes, but 8is not limited to, the ward's personal, philosophical, 9religious and moral beliefs, and ethical values relative to 10the decision to be made by the guardian. Where possible, the 11guardian shall determine how the ward would have made a 12decision based on the ward's previously expressed preferences, 13and make decisions in accordance with the preferences of the 14ward. If the ward's wishes are unknown and remain unknown 15after reasonable efforts to discern them, or if the guardian 16reasonably believes that a decision made in conformity with 17the ward's preferences would result in substantial harm to the 18ward's welfare or personal or financial interests, the 19decision shall be made on the basis of the ward's best 20interests as determined by the guardian. In determining the 21ward's best interests, the guardian shall weigh the reason for 22and nature of the proposed action, the benefit or necessity of 23the action, the possible risks and other consequences of the 24proposed action, and any available alternatives and their 25risks, consequences and benefits, and shall take into account 26any other information, including the views of family and   SB3713- 9 -LRB104 18238 JRC 31677 b1friends, that the guardian believes the ward would have 2considered if able to act for herself or himself.3    (f) Upon petition by any interested person (including the 4standby or short-term guardian), with such notice to 5interested persons as the court directs and a finding by the 6court that it is in the best interests of the person with a 7disability, the court may terminate or limit the authority of 8a standby or short-term guardian or may enter such other 9orders as the court deems necessary to provide for the best 10interests of the person with a disability. The petition for 11termination or limitation of the authority of a standby or 12short-term guardian may, but need not, be combined with a 13petition to have another guardian appointed for the person 14with a disability.15    (g)(1) Unless there is a court order to the contrary, the 16guardian, consistent with the standards set forth in 17subsection (e) of this Section, shall use reasonable efforts 18to notify the ward's known adult children, who have requested 19notification and provided contact information, of the ward's 20admission to a hospital, hospice, or palliative care program, 21the ward's death, and the arrangements for the disposition of 22the ward's remains.23    (2) If a guardian unreasonably prevents an adult child, 24spouse, adult grandchild, parent, or adult sibling of the ward 25from visiting the ward, the court, upon a verified petition, 26may order the guardian to permit visitation between the ward   SB3713- 10 -LRB104 18238 JRC 31677 b1and the adult child, spouse, adult grandchild, parent, or 2adult sibling. In making its determination, the court shall 3consider the standards set forth in subsection (e) of this 4Section. The court shall not allow visitation if the court 5finds that the ward has capacity to evaluate and communicate 6decisions regarding visitation and expresses a desire not to 7have visitation with the petitioner. This subsection (g) does 8not apply to duly appointed public guardians or the Office of 9State Guardian.10(Source: P.A. 101-329, eff. 8-9-19; 102-72, eff. 1-1-22; 11102-258, eff. 8-6-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)